North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93B. Occupational Licensing Boards.
§ 93B-12.
Information from licensing boards having authority over health care providers.

Every occupational licensing board having authority to license physicians, physician assistants, nurse practitioners, and nurse midwives in this State shall modify procedures for license renewal to include the collection of information specified in this section for each board’s regular renewal cycle. The purpose of this requirement is to assist the State in tracking the availability of health care providers to determine which areas in the State suffer from inequitable access to specific types of health services and to anticipate future health care shortages which might adversely affect the citizens of this State. Occupational licensing boards shall collect, report, and update the following information:

Area of health care specialty practice;

Address of all locations where the licensee practices; and

Other information the occupational licensing board deems relevant to assisting the State in achieving the purpose set out in this section, including social security numbers for research purposes only in matching other data sources.

Every occupational licensing board required to collect information pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall report and update the information on an annual basis to the Department of Health and Human Services. The Department shall provide this information to programs preparing primary care physicians, physicians assistants, and nurse practitioners upon request by the program and by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. Information provided by the occupational licensing board pursuant to this subsection may be provided in such form as to omit the identity of the health care licensee.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 23A.4; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 17, s. 16.4; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 93B-13.
Revocation when licensing privilege forfeited for nonpayment of child support or for failure to comply with subpoena.

Upon receipt of a court order, pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.12

and

G.S. 110-142.1

, revoking the occupational license of a licensee under its jurisdiction, an occupational licensing board shall note the revocation in its records, report the action within 30 days to the Department of Health and Human Services, and follow the normal postrevocation rules and procedures of the board as if the revocation had been ordered by the board. The revocation shall remain in effect until the board receives certification by the clerk of superior court or the Department of Health and Human Services in an IV-D case that the licensee is no longer delinquent in child support payments, or, as applicable, that the licensee is in compliance with or is no longer subject to the subpoena that was the basis for the revocation.

Upon receipt of notification from the Department of Health and Human Services that a licensee under an occupational licensing board’s jurisdiction has forfeited the licensee’s occupational license pursuant to

G.S. 110-142.1

, then the occupational licensing board shall send a notice of intent to revoke or suspend the occupational license of that licensee as provided by

G.S. 110-142.1

(d). If the license is revoked as provided by the provisions of G.S. 110-142.1, the revocation shall remain in effect until the board receives certification by the designated representative or the child support enforcement agency that the licensee is no longer delinquent in child support payments, or, as applicable, that the licensee is in compliance with or no longer subject to a subpoena that was the basis for the revocation.

If at the time the court revokes a license pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or if at the time the occupational licensing board revokes a license pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the occupational licensing board has revoked the same license under the licensing board’s disciplinary authority over licensees under its jurisdiction, and that revocation period is greater than the revocation period resulting from forfeiture pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.12

or

G.S. 110-142.1

then the revocation period imposed by the occupational licensing board applies.

Immediately upon certification by the clerk of superior court or the child support enforcement agency that the licensee whose license was revoked pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section is no longer delinquent in child support payments, the occupational licensing board shall reinstate the license. Immediately upon certification by the clerk of superior court or the child support enforcement agency that the licensee whose license was revoked because of failure to comply with a subpoena is in compliance with or no longer subject to the subpoena, the occupational licensing board shall reinstate the license. Reinstatement of a license pursuant to this section shall be made at no additional cost to the licensee.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 1.3; 1997-433, s. 5.4; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1; 2003-288, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

The number of this section was assigned by the Revisor of Statutes, the number as enacted by Session Laws 1995, c. 538, s. 1.3, having been

G.S. 93B-12

.

§ 93B-14.
Information on applicants for licensure.

Every occupational licensing board shall require applicants for licensure to provide to the Board the applicant’s social security number. This information shall be treated as confidential and may be released only as follows:

To the State Child Support Enforcement Program of the Department of Health and Human Services upon its request and for the purpose of enforcing a child support order.

To the Department of Revenue for the purpose of administering the State’s tax laws.

History.

1997-433, s. 4.6; 1997-443, s. 11A-122; 1998-17, s. 1; 1998-162, s. 9.

§ 93B-15.
Payment of license fees by members of the Armed Forces; board waiver rules.

An individual who is serving in the Armed Forces of the United States and to whom

G.S. 105-249.2

grants an extension of time to file a tax return is granted an extension of time to pay any license fee charged by an occupational licensing board as a condition of retaining a license granted by the board. The extension is for the same period that would apply if the license fee were a tax.

Occupational licensing boards shall adopt rules to postpone or waive continuing education, payment of renewal and other fees, and any other requirements or conditions relating to the maintenance of licensure by an individual who is currently licensed by and in good standing with the board, is serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, and to whom

G.S. 105-249.2

grants an extension of time to file a tax return.

History.

1998-95, s. 8; 1999-337, s. 12; 2009-458, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 68.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-458, s. 1, effective August 7, 2009, in the section heading, added “board waiver rules”; designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 68, effective June 20, 2011, in the section catchline and in subsections (a) and (b), substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces.”

§ 93B-15.1.
Licensure for individuals with military training and experience; proficiency examination; licensure by endorsement for military spouses; temporary license.

Except as provided by subsection (a2) of this section, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, an occupational licensing board, or State agency licensing board, as defined in

G.S. 93B-1

, shall issue a license, certification, or registration to a military-trained applicant to allow the applicant to lawfully practice the applicant’s occupation in this State if, upon application to an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, the military-trained applicant satisfies the following conditions:

Has been awarded a military occupational specialty and has done all of the following at a level that is substantially equivalent to or exceeds the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration of the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board from which the applicant is seeking licensure, certification, or registration in this State: completed a military program of training, completed testing or equivalent training and experience, and performed in the occupational specialty.

Has engaged in the active practice of the occupation for which the person is seeking a license, certification, or permit from the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State for at least two of the five years preceding the date of the application under this section.

Has not committed any act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted grounds for refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license to practice that occupation in this State at the time the act was committed and has no pending complaints.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-28, s. 3, effective July 1, 2017, and applicable to applications submitted on or after that date.

(a1)

No later than 15 days following receipt of an application from a military-trained applicant, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall either issue a license, certification, or registration or notify an applicant when the applicant’s military training or experience does not satisfy the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration and specify the criteria or requirements that the board determined that the applicant failed to meet and the basis for that determination. If a military-trained applicant has a pending complaint under subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall notify the applicant no later than 15 days following the board receiving written notice of the disposition of the pending complaint.

(a2)

An occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, as defined in

G.S. 93B-1

, shall issue a license, certification, or registration to a military-trained applicant to allow the applicant to lawfully practice the applicant’s occupation in this State if the military-trained applicant, upon application to the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, satisfies the following conditions:

(1)

Presents official, notarized documentation, such as a U.S. Department of Defense Form 214 (DD-214), or similar substantiation, attesting to the applicant’s military occupational specialty certification and experience in an occupational field within the board’s purview; and

(2)

Passes a proficiency examination offered by the board to military-trained applicants in lieu of satisfying the conditions set forth in subsection (a) of this section; however, if an applicant fails the proficiency examination, then the applicant may be required by the board to satisfy those conditions.

In any case where a proficiency examination is not offered routinely by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, the board shall design a fair proficiency examination for military-trained applicants to obtain licensure, certification, or registration under this section. If a proficiency examination is offered routinely by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, that examination shall satisfy the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, as defined in

G.S. 93B-1

, shall issue a license, certification, or registration to a military spouse to allow the military spouse to lawfully practice the military spouse’s occupation in this State if, upon application to an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board, the military spouse satisfies the following conditions:

Holds a current license, certification, or registration from another jurisdiction, and that jurisdiction’s requirements for licensure, certification, or registration are substantially equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration of the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board for which the applicant is seeking licensure, certification, or registration in this State.

Can demonstrate competency in the occupation through methods as determined by the Board, such as having completed continuing education units or having had recent experience for at least two of the five years preceding the date of the application under this section.

Has not committed any act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted grounds for refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license to practice that occupation in this State at the time the act was committed.

Is in good standing; has not been disciplined by the agency that had jurisdiction to issue the license, certification, or permit; and has no pending complaints.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-28, s. 3, effective July 1, 2017, and applicable to applications submitted on or after that date.

(b1)

No later than 15 days following receipt of an application from a military spouse, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall either issue a license, certification, or registration or notify an applicant when the applicant’s training or experience does not satisfy the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration and specify the criteria or requirements that the board determined that the applicant failed to meet and the basis for that determination. If an applicant who is a military spouse has a pending complaint under subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of this section, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall notify the applicant no later than 15 days following the board receiving written notice of the disposition of the pending complaint.

All relevant experience of a military service member in the discharge of official duties or, for a military spouse, all relevant experience, including full-time and part-time experience, regardless of whether in a paid or volunteer capacity, shall be credited in the calculation of years of practice in an occupation as required under subsection (a) or (b) of this section.

(c1)

Each occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall publish on its Web site all of the following:

A document that lists the specific criteria or requirements for licensure, registration, or certification by the board, with a description of the criteria or requirements that are satisfied by military training or experience as provided in this section, and any necessary documentation needed for obtaining the credit or satisfying the requirement.

A document that includes a summary of the opportunities available to veterans and military spouses under this section.

(c2)

The Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall publish on the Department’s Web site the information required under subsection (c1) of this section.

A nonresident licensed, certified, or registered under this section shall be entitled to the same rights and subject to the same obligations as required of a resident licensed, certified, or registered by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to the practice of law as regulated under Chapter 84 of the General Statutes.

An occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall issue a temporary practice permit to a military-trained applicant or military spouse licensed, certified, or registered in another jurisdiction while the military-trained applicant or military spouse is satisfying the requirements for licensure under subsection (a) or (b) of this section no later than 15 days following receipt of an application, if that jurisdiction has licensure, certification, or registration standards substantially equivalent to the standards for licensure, certification, or registration of an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State. The temporary practice permit shall be issued using the same information as provided by the applicant in the licensure application and remain valid for the later of one year or the required renewal date for the occupation the temporary practice permit was issued for or until a license, certification, or registration is granted by the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board. A temporary practice permit may be denied or revoked for a pending complaint after notice is provided to the military-trained applicant or military spouse as set forth under subsection (a1) or (b1) of this section.

An occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a military-trained applicant or military spouse from proceeding under the existing licensure, certification, or registration requirements established by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State.

In addition to the provisions for licensure provided by this section, a local board of education may request a three-year limited license for a military spouse who holds a current teaching license in another jurisdiction pursuant to G.S. 115C-270.20(a)(4a). The State Board of Education shall report the information specified in

G.S. 93B-2

(a)(9c) and (9d) in accordance with

G.S. 93B-2

.

For the purposes of this section, the North Carolina Medical Board shall not be considered an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board.

An occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall not charge a military-trained applicant or a military spouse an initial application fee for a license, certification, registration, or temporary practice permit issued pursuant to this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board from charging its ordinary fee for a renewal application or prohibit a third party from charging actual costs for a service such as a background check.

History.

2012-196, s. 1; 2014-67, s. 1; 2015-143, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 24.1(r); 2015-268, s. 7.3(a); 2017-28, s. 3; 2017-189, s. 6(a); 2019-71, s. 2.3; 2020-87, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2017-28, s. 4, made the amendments to subsections (a), (b), and (f), and addition of (k) of this section, effective July 1, 2017, and applicable to applications submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws 2017-189, s. 7(a) made the amendment to subsection (i) by Session Laws 2017-189, s. 6(a), effective July 27, 2017, and applicable beginning with the 2017-2018 school year.

Session Laws 2019-71, s. 6, as amended by Session Laws 2019-212, s. 8(f), made the second sentence in subsection (i) as added by Session Laws 2019-71, s. 2.3, effective July 1, 2019, and applicable beginning with the eighteenth day following the effective date of this act [July 1, 2019].

Session Laws 2019-201, s. 2(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Program Evaluation Division, in consultation with the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, shall study the extent to which the provisions of

G.S. 93B-1

5.1 have improved the ability of military-trained applicants and military spouses to become licensed by occupational licensing boards in the State. All occupational licensing boards, as that term is defined in

G.S. 93B-1

, shall cooperate with the Program Evaluation Division in conducting this study, including providing data on its compliance with the provisions of

G.S. 93B-15.1

. In conducting the study, the Program Evaluation Division shall consider, among other things, the following:

“(1) Whether the criteria in

G.S. 93B-15.1

should be expanded to allow for the licensure of more military-trained applicants and military spouses.

“(2) The effectiveness of publishing information on the criteria for licensure of military spouses, as required by

G.S. 93B-15.1

, and whether there are additional platforms on which this information should be published to ensure broader dissemination to military spouses.

“(3) The feasibility and effectiveness of including a question about military status, including status as a military spouse, on applications for licensure.

“(4) Determining what steps can be taken to provide or enhance continuing education programs to assist military spouses in maintaining an active occupational license, even if issued by another state.

“(5) Providing training for at least one employee in the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs on the licensure process outlined in

G.S. 93B-15.1

for military-trained applicants and military spouses, and considering ways in which to disseminate information about this employee’s availability to applicants.

“(6) Whether to develop a process for annually gathering data from all occupational licensing boards on the number of military-trained applicants and military spouses who (i) were licensed pursuant to

G.S. 93B-15.1

or under the existing licensure, certification, or registration requirements established by occupational licensing boards and (ii) were denied licensure. The data shall include a summary of the reasons military-trained applicants and military spouses were denied licensure, but shall not disclose any identifying information about any applicant.

“(b) By February 1, 2020, the Program Evaluation Division shall report the findings of its study and any recommendations for proposed legislation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government and to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.”

Session Laws 2020-87, s. 4, made the amendment of this section by Session Laws 2020-87, s. 1, effective December 1, 2020, and applicable to applications for licensure received on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-67, s. 1, effective January 1, 2015, near the end of subdivision (a)(1), deleted “as determined by the board” following “equivalent training and experience”; and added subsections (a1) and (c1).

Session Laws 2015-143, s. 1, effective July 8, 2015, inserted “proficiency examination” in the section heading; substituted “Except as provided by subsection (a2) of this section, and notwithstanding” for “Notwithstanding” at the beginning of subsection (a); and added subsection (a2).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(r), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Military and Veterans Affairs” for “North Carolina Division of Veterans Affairs” in the last sentence of subsection (c1).

Session Laws 2017-28, s. 3, in subdivisions (a)(3) and (b)(4), added “and has no pending complaints” to the end; deleted subdivisions (a)(4) and (b)(5); in subsection (f), substituted “shall issue” for “may issue” in the first sentence and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The military-trained applicant or military spouse may practice under the temporary permit until a license, certification, or registration is granted or until a notice to deny a license, certification, or registration is issued in accordance with rules adopted by the occupational licensing board”; added subsection (k); and made stylistic and related changes. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-189, s. 6(a), substituted “Article 17E of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes” for “G.S. 115C-296” in subsection (i). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2019-71, s. 2.3, added the last sentence to subsection (i). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-87, s. 1, added “or State agency licensing board” throughout the section; rewrote subsection (a1); added “satisfies the following conditions:” at the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a2); added subsection (b1); rewrote subsection (c1); added subsection (c2); rewrote subsection (f); and, in subsection (i), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “For the purposes of this section, the State Board of Education shall be considered an occupational licensing board when issuing teacher licenses under Article 17E of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.” and added the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 93B-16.
Occupational board liability for negligent acts.

An occupational licensing board may purchase commercial insurance of any kind to cover all risks or potential liability of the board, its members, officers, employees, and agents, including the board’s liability under Articles 31 and 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Occupational licensing boards shall be deemed State agencies for purposes of Articles 31 and 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and board members and employees of occupational licensing boards shall be considered State employees for purposes of Articles 31 and 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. To the extent an occupational licensing board purchases commercial liability insurance coverage in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per claim for liability arising under Article 31 or 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the provisions of

G.S. 143-299.4

shall not apply. To the extent that an occupational licensing board purchases commercial insurance coverage for liability arising under Article 31 or 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the provisions of

G.S. 143-300.6(c)

shall not apply.

The purchase of insurance by an occupational licensing board under this section shall not be construed to waive sovereign immunity or any other defense available to the board, its members, officers, employees, or agents in an action or contested matter in any court, agency, or tribunal. The purchase of insurance by an occupational licensing board shall not be construed to alter or expand the limitations on claims or payments established in

G.S. 143-299.2

or limit the right of board members, officers, employees, or agents to defense by the State as provided by

G.S. 143-300.3

.

History.

2002-168, s. 1.